Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 6 Radio Common Carriers

46-6-1 through 46-6-16.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1037, § 1, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter consisted of Code Sections 46-6-1 through 46-6-16, relating to radio common carriers, and was based on Ga. L. 1970, p. 104, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 439, §§ 1, 2, 4-17; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2195, § 1.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 46/HB 79, reserved the designation of this chapter, effective April 24, 2013.